Wisconsin, session 2025, AB649.
do enact as follows:AB649,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB649,2,62(1) Department of public instruction; request. By no later than July 1, 32026, the department of public instruction shall submit a request to the joint 4committee on finance to supplement from the joint committee on finance 5supplemental appropriation under s. 20.865 (4) (a) a department appropriation for 6each of the purposes described in Section 2 (1) to (3) of this act.AB649,27Section 2. Fiscal changes.AB649,2,118(1) Feasibility studies; grants. For fiscal year 2026, the dollar amount in 9the schedule for the appropriation under s. 20.865 (4) (a) is increased by $250,000 10for reimbursements to school boards for the costs incurred for feasibility studies for 11school district consolidation or whole grade sharing.AB649,2,1512(2) Whole grade sharing; grants. For fiscal year 2026, the dollar amount 13in the schedule for the appropriation under s. 20.865 (4) (a) is increased by 14$2,700,000 for grants to school boards that enter into a whole grade sharing 15agreement.AB649,2,2016(3) Supplemental state aid for consolidated school districts. For 17fiscal year 2026, the dollar amount in the schedule for the appropriation under s. 1820.865 (4) (a) is increased by $3,000,000 for additional aid to consolidated school 19districts that have a maximum allowable levy rate that is greater than the lowest 20levy rate of their underlying school districts.AB649,2,2121